Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5111
Computation of investment limitations.

Any investment limitation in the Insurers Investment Act based upon the amount of the insurer's admitted assets or policyholders surplus shall relate to admitted assets or policyholders surplus as shown by the most recent financial statement filed by the insurer pursuant to section 44-322 unless the insurer's admitted assets or policyholders surplus is revised as a result of an examination conducted pursuant to the Insurers Examination Act, in which case the results of the examination shall control. Except as otherwise provided by law, an investment shall be measured by the lesser of actual cost or admitted value at the time of acquisition. If there is no actual cost at the time of acquisition, the investment shall be measured at the lesser of fair value or admitted value.

For purposes of this section, actual cost means the total amount invested, expended, or which should be reasonably anticipated to be invested or expended in the acquisition or organization of any investment, insurer, or subsidiary, including all organizational expenses or contributions to capital and surplus whether or not represented by the purchase of capital stock or issuance of other securities.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 111;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 14.

Insurers Examination Act, see section 44-5901.